Hawaii statutes.
§226-52 Statewide planning system.
(a) The statewide planning system shall consist of the following policies,
plans, and programs:

(1) The overall theme, goals, objectives, and
policies established in this chapter that shall provide the broad guidelines
for the State;

(2) The priority guidelines established in this
chapter that shall provide guidelines for decisionmaking by the State and the
counties for the immediate future and set priorities for the allocation of
resources. The formulation and revision of state functional plans shall be in
conformance with the priority guidelines;

(3) State functional plans that shall be prepared to
address, but not be limited to, the areas of agriculture, conservation lands,
education, energy, higher education, health, historic preservation, housing,
recreation, tourism, and transportation. The preparing agency for each state
functional plan shall also consider applicable federal laws, policies, or
programs that impact upon the functional plan area. State functional plans
shall define, implement, and be in conformance with the overall theme, goals,
objectives, policies, and priority guidelines contained within this chapter.
County general plans and development plans shall be taken into consideration in
the formulation and revision of state functional plans;

(4) County general plans that shall indicate desired
population and physical development patterns for each county and regions within
each county. In addition, county general plans or development plans shall address
the unique problems and needs of each county and regions within each county.
County general plans or development plans shall further define the overall
theme, goals, objectives, policies, and priority guidelines contained within
this chapter. State functional plans shall be taken into consideration in
amending the county general plans; and

(5) State programs that shall include but not be
limited to programs involving coordination and review; research and support;
design, construction, and maintenance; services; and regulatory powers. State
programs that exercise coordination and review functions shall include but not
be limited to the state clearinghouse process, the capital improvements
program, and the coastal zone management program. State programs that exercise
regulatory powers in resource allocation shall include but not be limited to
the land use and management programs administered by the land use commission
and the board of land and natural resources. State programs shall further
define, implement, and be in conformance with the overall theme, goals,
objectives, and policies, and shall utilize as guidelines the priority
guidelines contained within this chapter, and the state functional plans
approved pursuant to this chapter.

(b) The statewide planning system shall also
consist of several implementation mechanisms, including:

(1) Overall plan review, coordination, and
evaluation. Overall plan review, coordination, and evaluation shall be
conducted by the office;

(2) The state budgetary, land use, and other
decisionmaking processes. The state budgetary, land use, and other
decisionmaking processes shall consist of:

(A) The program appropriations process. The
appropriation of funds for major programs under the biennial and supplemental
budgets shall be in conformance with the overall theme, goals, objectives, and
policies, and shall utilize as guidelines the priority guidelines contained
within this chapter, and the state functional plans approved pursuant to this
chapter;

(B) The capital improvement project
appropriations process. The appropriation of funds for major plans and
projects under the capital improvements program shall be in conformance with
the overall theme, goals, objectives, and policies, and shall utilize as guidelines
the priority guidelines contained within this chapter, and the state functional
plans approved pursuant to this chapter;

(C) The budgetary review process of the
department of budget and finance. The budgetary review and allocation process
of the department of budget and finance shall be in conformance with the
overall theme, goals, objectives, and policies, and shall utilize as guidelines
the priority guidelines contained within this chapter, and the state functional
plans approved pursuant to this chapter;

(D) Land use decisionmaking processes of state
agencies. Land use decisions made by state agencies shall be in conformance
with the overall theme, goals, objectives, and policies, and shall utilize as
guidelines the priority guidelines contained within this chapter, and the state
functional plans approved pursuant to this chapter. The rules adopted by
appropriate state agencies to govern land use decisionmaking shall be in
conformance with the overall theme, goals, objectives, and policies contained
within this chapter; and

(E) All other regulatory and administrative
decisionmaking processes of state agencies, which shall be in conformance with
the overall theme, goals, objectives, and policies, and shall utilize as
guidelines the priority guidelines contained within this chapter, and the state
functional plans approved pursuant to this chapter. Rules adopted by state
agencies to govern decisionmaking shall be in conformance with the overall
theme, goals, objectives, and policies contained within this chapter;

(3) The strategic planning processes. The office and
other state agencies shall conduct strategic planning activities to identify
and analyze significant issues, problems, and opportunities confronting the
State, including the examination and evaluation of state programs in
implementing state policies and the formulation of strategies and alternative
courses of action in response to identified problems and opportunities.
Strategic planning processes may include the conduct of surveys and other
monitoring instruments such as environmental scanning to assess current social,
economic, and physical conditions and trends. In conducting strategic planning
activities, the office and other state agencies shall ensure that general
public and agency concerns are solicited and taken into consideration. The
formation of task forces, ad hoc committees, or other advisory bodies comprised
of interested parties may serve to facilitate public involvement in specific
planning projects; and

(4) Other coordination processes which include the
use of the state clearinghouse process. The state clearinghouse shall
coordinate the review of all federally-assisted and direct federal development
projects which are covered under the state clearinghouse process. [L 1978, c
100, pt of §2; am L 1984, c 236, §4; am L 1985, c 68, §4; am L 1987, c 336,
§4(2); am L 1988, c 70, §7; am L 1991, c 76, pt of §1]

Law Journals and Reviews

Water Regulation,
Land Use and the Environment. 30 UH L. Rev. 49 (2007).

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next